Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-634
Birth or death certificate; correction.

The department shall charge and collect the same fee as prescribed in subsection (1) of section 71-612 for each proceeding under sections 71-630 and 71-635 to 71-644. All fees so collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. The department shall collect the fees required by section 71-612 for a certified copy of the amended record. All fees for a certified copy shall be handled as provided in section 71-612.

If a certificate is amended pursuant to sections 71-630 and 71-635 to 71-644 as the result of an error committed by the department in the issuance of such certificate, the department may waive any fee required under this section.

Laws 1947, c. 234, § 5, p. 741;

Laws 1953, c. 244, § 1, p. 834;

Laws 1959, c. 323, § 9, p. 1184;

Laws 1965, c. 418, § 11, p. 1340;

Laws 1965, c. 419, § 5, p. 1344;

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 483, § 11;

Laws 1978, LB 671, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 33;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 57;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 36;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 543;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 18;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 61;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 90;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 437.